Utah statutes.
63M-1-202.   Director of office -- Appointment -- Removal -- Compensation.

(1)  The office shall be administered, directed, controlled, organized, and managed by a director appointed by the governor.

(2)  The director serves at the pleasure of the governor.

(3)  The salary of the director shall be established by the governor within the salary range fixed by the Legislature in Title 67, Chapter 22, State Officer Compensation.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

